District of Columbia statutes.
47-2806

Licenses to be posted on premises; exhibition to police.

All licenses granted under the terms of this chapter must be conspicuously posted on the premises of the licensee and said licenses shall be accessible at all times for inspection by the police or other officers duly authorized to make such inspections. Licensees having no located place of business shall exhibit their licenses when requested to do so by any of the officers above named.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 623, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 6
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 551, ch. 366
Apr. 30. 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 43(c), 35 DCR 147
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1973 Ed., § 47-2306.
1981 Ed., § 47-2806.
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.